Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.080

University building fund.

There shall be in the state treasury a fund known and designated as the "University of Washington building account".

[ 1985 c 57 s 36; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.080. Prior: 1915 c 66 s 1; RRS s 5535.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.